pl: Umiejętności rozgrywki: Arytmetyka; Koncentracja; Odliczenie; Elastyczność; Rysunek; Myślenie lateralne; Nauka; Dopasowanie; Pamięć; Negocjacje; Rozpoznawanie wzorców; Strategiczne myślenie; Podejmowanie decyzji taktycznych; Pozostałe
zh-TW: 玩法技能: 算術; 專注; 推理; 靈巧; 繪畫; 橫向思維; 學習; 配對; 記憶體; 協商; 圖像辨識; 策略思考; 戰術決策; 其他
hr-HR: Vještine korištene u igri: Aritmetika; Koncentracija; Dedukcija; Vještina; Crtanje; Lateralno razmišljanje; Učenje; Povezivanje; Pamćenje; Pregovaranje; Prepoznavanje uzoraka; Strateško razmišljanje; Taktičko odlučivanje; Ostalo
ja: ゲームプレイで求められるスキル: 計算; 集中; 控除; 器用さ; ドローイング; 水平思考; 学習; マッチング; メモリ; 交渉; パターン認識; 戦略的思考; 戦術的な意思決定; その他
ko: 게임 플레이 기술: 산수; 집중; 공제; 손재주; 드로잉; 수평적 사고; 학습; 매칭; 추억; 협상; 패턴 인식; 전략적 사고; 전략적 의사결정; 기타
lt-LT: Žaidimo įgūdžiai: Aritmetika; Susitelkimas; Dedukcija; Vikrumas; Braižyba; Lateralinis mąstymas; Mokymasis; Derinimas; Atmintis; Derybos; Rašto atpažinimas; Strateginis mąstymas; Taktinis sprendimų priėmimas; Kita
el: Δεξιότητες παιχνιδιού: Αριθμητική; Συγκέντρωση; Επαγωγή; Επιδεξιότητα; Σχέδιο; Δημιουργική σκέψη; Εκμάθηση; Αντιστοίχιση; Μνήμη; Διαπραγμάτευση; Αναγνώριση μοτίβων; Στρατηγική σκέψη; Λήψη στρατηγικών αποφάσεων; Άλλο
tr: Oyun becerileri: Aritmetik; Odaklanma; Kesinti; El becerisi; Çizim; Detaylı düşünme; Öğrenme; Eşleştirme; Bellek; Müzakere; Örüntü tanıma; Stratejik düşünce; Taktiksel karar; Diğer
bg-BG: Умения за игра: Аритметика; Концентрация; Дедукция; Ловкост; Рисуване; Нестандартно мислене; Обучение; Съвпадение; Памет; Водене на преговори; Разпознаване на модели; Стратегическо мислене; Вземане на тактически решения; Други
sv: Spelfärdigheter: Aritmetiskt; Koncentration; Deduktion; Fingerfärdighet; Rita; Lateralt tänkande; Inlärning; Matchning; Minne; Förhandling; Mönsterigenkänning; Strategiskt tänkande; Taktiskt beslutsfattande; Annat
en: Gameplay skills: Arithmetic; Concentration; Deduction; Dexterity; Drawing; Lateral thinking; Learning; Matching; Memory; Negotiation; Pattern recognition; Strategic thinking; Tactical decision making; Other
nb: Spillferdigheter: Aritmetikk; Konsentrasjon; Fradrag; Behendighet; Tegning; Lateral tenkning; Læring; Matchende; Minne; Forhandling; Mønstergjenkjenning; Strategisk tenkning; Taktisk beslutningstaking; Annen
sk-SK: Herné zručnosti: Aritmetika; Koncentrácia; Odpočet; Obratnosť; Kreslenie; Laterálne myslenie; Učenie; Hľadanie zhody; Pamäť; Vyjednávanie; Rozpoznávanie vzorov; Strategické myslenie; Taktické rozhodovanie; Iné
de: Gameplay-Fähigkeiten: Rechnen; Konzentration; Abzug; Geschicklichkeit; Zeichnung; Querdenken; Lernen; Passend; Memory; Verhandeln; Mustererkennung; Strategisches Denken; Taktische Entscheidungen; Sonstiges
th: ทักษะการเล่นเกม: เลขคณิต; ใช้สมาธิ; จับโกหก; ความแม่นยำ; การวาดภาพ; การคิดนอกกรอบ; การเรียนรู้; การจับคู่; ความจำ; การเจรจาต่อรอง; การจดจำรูปแบบ; การคิดเชิงกลยุทธ์; การตัดสินใจทางยุทธวิธี; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 游戏技巧: 算术游戏; 专注; 推理; 灵巧; 绘画; 横向思维; 学习; 匹配; 存储器; 谈判游戏; 图案识别游戏; 战略思维游戏; 战术决策游戏; 其他
cs: Herní dovednosti: Aritmetika; Koncentrace; Dedukce; Obratnost; Kreslení; Laterální myšlení; Učení; Odpovídající; Paměti; Vyjednávání; Rozpoznávání vzorů; Strategické myšlení; Taktické rozhodování; Jiné
ru: Развиваемые игрой навыки: Арифметика; Концентрация; Дедукция; Ловкость; Рисование; Нестандартное мышление; Обучение; Сопоставление; Память; Переговоры; Распознавание образов; Стратегическое мышление; Принятие тактических решений; Другой
pt-BR: Habilidades de jogo: Aritmética; Concentração; Dedução; Destreza; Desenho; Pensamento lateral; Aprendizado; Combinação; Memória; Negociação; Reconhecimento de padrões; Pensamento estratégico; Tomada de decisão tática; Outro
hu: Játékkészségek: Aritmetika; Koncentráció; Következtetés; Ügyesség; Rajz; Laterális gondolkodás; Tanulás; Egyeztetés; Memória; Tárgyalás; Mintafelismerés; Stratégiai gondolkodás; Taktikai döntéshozatal; Egyéb
ro-RO: Abilități de joc: Aritmetică; Concentrare; Deducție; Dexteritate; Desen; Gândirea laterală; Învățare; Potrivire; Memorie; Negociere; Recunoașterea modelelor; Gândire strategică; Luarea de decizii tactice; Altele
es: Habilidades de juego: Aritmética; Concentración; Deducción; Destreza; Dibujo; Pensamiento lateral; Aprendizaje; Emparejamiento; Memoria; Negociación; Reconocimiento de patrones; Pensamiento estratégico; Toma de decisiones tácticas; Otros
vi: Kỹ năng chơi: Số học; Sự tập trung; Suy luận; Khéo léo; Bản vẽ; Tư duy ngoại biên; Học tập; Tìm cặp; Trí nhớ; Đàm phán; Nhận dạng mẫu; Suy nghĩ chiến lược; Ra quyết định mang tính chiến thuật; Khác
da: Gameplay-færdigheder: Aritmetik; Koncentration; Fradrag; Behændighed; Tegning; Lateral tænkning; Læring; Matching; Hukommelse; Forhandling; Mønstergenkendelse; Strategisk tænkning; Taktisk beslutningstagning; Andet
nl: Gameplay-vaardigheden: Rekenkundig; Concentratie; Inhouding; Behendigheid; Tekenen; Lateraal denken; Leren; Matchen; Geheugen; Onderhandeling; Patroonherkenning; Strategisch denken; Tactische besluitvorming; Andere
pt-PT: Técnicas de jogo: Aritmética; Concentração; Dedução; Destreza; Desenho; Pensamento lateral; Aprendizagem; Correspondência; Memória; Negociação; Reconhecimento de padrões; Pensamento estratégico; Tomada de decisão tática; Outro
sl-SI: Spretnosti, pridobljene z igranjem: Aritmetika; Koncentracija; Sklepanje; Spretnost; Risanje; Lateralno razmišljanje; Učenje; Ujemanje; Spomin; Pogajanje; Prepoznavanje vzorcev; Strateško razmišljanje; Taktično odločanje; Drugo
fr: Compétences de jeu: Arithmétique; Concentration; Déduction; Dextérité; Dessin; Pensée latérale; Apprentissage; Correspondance; Mémoire; Négociation; Reconnaissance de formes; Réflexion stratégique; Prise de décision tactique; Autre
it: Abilità di gioco: Aritmetica; Concentrazione; Deduzione; Destrezza; Disegno; Pensiero laterale; Apprendimento; Abbinamenti; Memoria; Negoziazione; Riconoscimento di modelli; Pensiero strategico; Processo decisionale tattico; Altro
fi: Pelaamistaidot: Aritmeettinen; Keskittyminen; Päättely; Ketteryys; Piirustus; Lateraalinen ajattelu; Oppiminen; Vastaava; Muisti; Neuvottelu; Hahmontunnistus; Strateginen ajattelu; Taktinen päätöksenteko; Muu